North Dakota statutes. TITLE 59 Trusts
CHAPTER 59-05 Powers in Relation to Real Property [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27]

59-05-01.
What powers permitted. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-02.
Power — Definition. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-03.
Power of attorney excluded. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-04.
Author of a power — Definition. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-05.
Holder of a power — Definition. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-06.
Powers — Classification. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-07.
General power — Definition. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-08.
Special powers — Definition. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-09.
Beneficial powers — Definition. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-10.
Power in trust — Definition. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-11.
General power in trust. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-12.
Special power in trust. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-13.
Capacity to create a power. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-14.
Creation of a power. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-15.
Power vests in whom. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-16.
Reservation of power by grantor. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-17.
When power is irrevocable. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-18.
When power is a lien. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-19.
When power deemed part of security. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-20.
Who cannot execute power. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-21.
How power executed. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-22.
Execution — By all of several — By survivors. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-23.
Execution by will. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-24.
Execution by grant. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-25.
Execution by insufficient instrument not void. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-26.
Observance of superfluous formalities not necessary. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-27.
Nominal conditions disregarded. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-28.
Binding conditions — Court may supply defective execution. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-29.
Consent of third person — How expressed. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-30.
Survivors’ consent. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-31.
Execution valid without recital of power. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-32.
Requisites for a conveyance — Exceptions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-33.
Disposition or charge beyond authority valid. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-34.
Conditions at creation determine legality. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-35.
Grantor reserving revocation deemed owner as to creditors and purchasers. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-36.
Time runs from creation of power. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 484, § 6.

59-05-37.
Relief of purchasers for valuable consideration. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-38.
Effect of fraud. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-39.
Estates changed into fee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-40.
Estates — When absolute fee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-41.
Estates not limited by a remainder. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-42.
To devise inheritance is an absolute fee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-43.
Power absolute — Disposition during lifetime. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-44.
Special or beneficial powers valid during life estate. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-45.
Power to lease void as to excess term. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-46.
When power to lease transferable. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-47.
Release by owner — Time of extinguishment of power. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-48.
Powers enforceable for parties interested. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-49.
Mortgage does not extinguish power — Effects. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-50.
When power subject to creditors’ claims. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-51.
Powers not specified or defined herein void. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-52.
Equal shares when no allotment specification. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-53.
Discretionary power. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-54.
Death of trustee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-55.
District court acts if testator omits to designate trustee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-56.
Transferable interest — Judgment for creditors or assignees. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-57.
Execution of power defective — How defect cured. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-58.
Application of other laws. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-05-59.
Subsequent grant is revocation of power. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.